Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1404
Nebraska Invasive Species Council;
duties.

The
Nebraska Invasive Species Council shall:

(1) Recommend
action to minimize the effects of harmful invasive species on Nebraska's citizens
in order to promote the economic and environmental well-being of the state;

(2) Develop
and periodically update a statewide adaptive management plan for invasive
species as described in section 37-1405;

(3) Serve as a forum for discussion, identification,
and understanding of invasive species issues;

(4) Facilitate the communication,
cooperation, and coordination of local, state, federal, private, and nongovernmental
entities for the prevention, control, and management of invasive species;

(5) Assist
with public outreach and awareness of invasive species issues; and

(6) Provide
information to the Legislature for decision making, planning, and coordination
of invasive species management and prevention.

Laws 2012, LB391, § 14.